Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0696.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2a. (1) Subject to subsection (2), a township board may by resolution adopted by 2/3 of the members elected to and serving on the township board change the name of the township. The resolution must include the new name of the township. (2) A resolution adopted under subsection (1) does not take effect unless the resolution is approved by a majority of the electors of the township voting on the question at an election to be held on the next August May regular election date or November regular election date, whichever occurs first, that is not less than 60 days after the date the resolution is adopted. (3) If a majority of the electors of the township voting on the question approve the resolution, the name of that township is authorized to be changed by the township to the new name in the resolution. (4) A township does not have the authority to change its the township's name more than once every 25 years. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect January 1, 2028. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 691 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.